Vermont, session 2025-2026, S286.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 32 V.S.A. chapter 225, subchapter 5 is added to read:
Subchapter 5. School Construction Surcharge
§ 9311. IMPOSITION; SCHOOL CONSTRUCTION SURCHARGE
(a)(1) An operator shall collect a surcharge of two percent of the rent of
each occupancy subject to tax under subsection 9241(a) of this title.
(2) An operator shall collect a surcharge of two percent on the sale of
each taxable meal subject to tax under subsection 9241(b) of this title.
VT LEG #384986 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.286
2026 Page 2 of 3
(3) An operator shall collect a surcharge of two percent on the sale of
alcoholic beverages subject to tax under subsection 9241(c) of this title.
(b) The surcharge shall be in addition to any tax assessed under section
9241 of this chapter. The surcharge assessed under this section shall be paid,
collected, remitted, and enforced under this chapter in the same manner as the
rooms tax assessed under section 9241 of this title.
(c) The surcharge shall be itemized on the invoice or bill and include a
statement that the surcharge is “for support of Vermont’s School Construction
Aid Special Fund.”
(d) It is the intent of the General Assembly that the surcharge imposed by
this section have the exact same tax base as the meals and rooms tax imposed
under section 9241 of this chapter.
§ 9312. DEPOSIT OF SURCHARGE REVENUE
Revenue from the surcharge imposed under this subchapter shall be
deposited in the School Construction Aid Special Fund established under 16
V.S.A. § 3444.
Sec. 2. 16 V.S.A. § 3444 is amended to read:
§ 3444. SCHOOL CONSTRUCTION AID SPECIAL FUND
* * *
(b) Funds. The Fund shall consist of:
(1) any amounts transferred or appropriated to it by the General
VT LEG #384986 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.286
2026 Page 3 of 3
Assembly; and
(2) revenue from the school construction surcharge levied pursuant to 32
V.S.A. chapter 225, subchapter 5; and
(3) any interest earned by the Fund.
Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on August 1, 2026.
VT LEG #384986 v.2